District of Columbia statutes.
19-312

Share of grandfather and grandmother.

The grandparents, or such of them as survive, share alike where there are no collaterals.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-312.
1973 Ed., § 19-312.